Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201816-232
Excavations; regulation.

A city of the first class by ordinance may prevent the digging of holes, pits, or excavations within the city, except for the purpose of building where such excavations are made, prevent the leaving of any holes, pits, or excavations within such city in an exposed condition, and require the filling of same.

Laws 1907, c. 13, § 1, p. 111;

R.S.1913, § 4848;

C.S.1922, § 4016;

C.S.1929, § 16-233;

R.S.1943, § 16-232;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 35.